Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 16 Revenue Estimating Conferences

35-16-1.
Purpose and membership.

In order to provide for a more stable and accurate method of financial planning and budgeting and to facilitate the adoption of a balanced budget wherein appropriations and expenditures do not exceed anticipated revenues, as is required by the statutes and constitution of Rhode Island, it is hereby declared the intention of the legislature that there be a procedure for the determination of an official estimate of anticipated state revenues upon which the executive budget shall be based and beyond which appropriations by the legislature and expenditures by the state shall not exceed.

The budget office, the house fiscal advisor, and the senate fiscal advisor shall meet in regularly scheduled consensus revenue estimating conferences (R.E.C.). These conferences shall be open public meetings.

The chairpersonship of each regularly scheduled R.E.C. will rotate among the state budget officer, the house fiscal advisor, and the senate fiscal advisor, hereinafter referred to as principals. The schedule shall be arranged so that no chairperson shall preside over two (2) successive regularly scheduled conferences on the same subject.

Representatives of all state agencies, including by way of illustration, and not by way of limitation, the division of taxation, department of transportation, department of business regulation, department of health, and the office of general treasurer and any other state agency or board responsible for a revenue source under consideration by the R.E.C., are to participate in all conferences for which their input is germane.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 49, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 407, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 19, § 1.

35-16-2.
Meetings.

The principals of the R.E.C. shall meet within the first ten (10) days of May and November of each year.

The primary purpose of regularly scheduled conferences is to prepare economic forecasts and forecast revenue estimates and review current revenue collections under current tax law. The conference principals can agree, however, to address special legislation or special topics.

Prior to each R.E.C., the principals will determine the documentation and information necessary to support that conference.

No votes will be taken in the revenue estimating conferences. These are truly consensus conferences and all principals must agree and are bound to the conference recommendations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 49, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 407, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 60, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 43, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 1, § 12; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 19, § 1.

35-16-3.
Additional meetings.

Any time during a fiscal year that any principal feels that the recommendations of the revenue estimating conference are no longer valid, then that principal, with appropriate notice, may convene a revenue estimating conference. The principal requesting the additional conference shall be the chairperson for that conference.

If at any time during a fiscal year any participant feels that the recommendations of the revenue estimating conference are no longer valid with respect to their revenue sources then that participant has a duty to and shall notify each of the principals.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 49, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 407, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 19, § 1.

35-16-4.
Impact meetings.

The revenue estimating conference principals, along with the appropriate participants, will meet from time to time to compare current fiscal statistics with the most recent financial projection as required by §

35-3-1(a)(6)

. Any principal can call an impact meeting at any time.

Following each legislative session, the principals, along with the appropriate participants, shall meet and review all changes in tax legislation and shall amend the official recommendations of the revenue estimating conference accordingly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 49, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 407, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 410, § 18.

35-16-5.
Staff support for meetings.

The R.E.C. chairperson and his or her staff will be responsible for preparing and distributing work papers before each conference. Each participant and principal will be responsible for providing the chairperson with the appropriate materials for the work papers on a schedule determined by the chairperson. Failure to meet this schedule shall be grounds, at the chairperson’s option, to delay the conference.

Work papers will include a side by side comparison of the revenue scenarios advocated by each of the principals. This analysis and its side by side presentation will be completed in time to distribute to each R.E.C. party at least one full day prior to the scheduled meeting date.

The principals may request each participant to provide the R.E.C. chairperson and the remaining principals an independent revenue estimate and supporting information for each revenue source under the responsibility of the participant’s agency. This information should be provided on a schedule provided by the conference chairperson and will be included in the conference comparison report.

The principals may request that each participant shall notify the R.E.C. chairperson of any prospective administrative changes contemplated by their respective agency which will affect the cash flow of any revenue source under consideration.

For general revenue conferences, the principals shall adopt a consensus economic forecast upon which to base revenue estimates. The principals shall obtain the services of economists and economic forecast services as required for this purpose. The consensus economic forecast shall be available to each principal in a timely fashion for each principal to prepare revenue estimates.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 49, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 407, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 19, § 1.

35-16-6.
Report of meetings.

The chairperson will be the sole source of any public announcement of the results from the conference. The final report will be prepared by the chairperson and distributed to conference participants not later than five (5) working days after adjournment. The reports shall contain the following:

Tables showing the values of all relevant economic and demographic indicators;

A fiscal year breakdown of all general revenue receipts by source; and

A comparison of actual revenue collected with the revenue projections upon which the then current budget was based.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 49, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 407, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 60, § 1.

35-16-7.
Two year budget cycle study.

The budget office, the house fiscal advisor, and the senate fiscal advisor along with the house and senate fiscal staff and legal counsel shall study the feasibility and benefits of adopting a two (2) year budget cycle, and shall report in writing to the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the president of the senate on or before January 2, 1994. The report shall address not only the benefits, if any, but also any disadvantages and/or legal impediments, constitutional and/or statutory, to adopting such a budget cycle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 86, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 74.